Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3330
Private nonprofit corporation; designation.

On October 1, 1995, if all provisions of sections 2-3326 to 2-3328 have been complied with, the private nonprofit corporation shall become the qualified state soybean board for Nebraska for the purposes of the federal Soybean Promotion, Research, and Consumer Information Act of 1990, 7 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.

Laws 1995, LB 434, § 6.